Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4117.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,
2027, out of the General Fund, the amount of $10,000,000, for deposit in the Universal Rep-
resentation Fund established under ORS 9.865 and disbursement to Oregon Worker Relief as
the fiscal agent under ORS 9.865.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 98